Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 4. Private Trust Companies.

Sec. 06.26.200.
Private trust companies.

Unless the department expressly in writing exempts the person under this section from all or some of the provisions of this chapter, a private trust company shall comply with the provisions of this chapter applicable to a trust company.

A person may apply in writing for an exemption from specific provisions of this chapter. The department may grant the exemption, in whole or in part, if the department finds that the person qualifies under (c) of this section and does not and will not offer fiduciary services to the general public.

To qualify as a private trust company, a person shall be a corporation organized under AS 10.06, a limited liability company organized under AS 10.50, or a limited partnership formed under AS 32.11, and the person’s

articles of incorporation, articles of organization, or partnership agreement must prohibit the person from acting as a fiduciary of a trust, except for a trust created during the lifetime or upon the death of

one named individual;

a child, grandchild, or greatgrandchild of the individual identified in (A) of this paragraph, but not including a stepchild, stepgrandchild, or stepgreatgrandchild;

a spouse or former spouse, including a person divorced from the individual, of an individual identified in (A) and (B) of this paragraph; and

headquarters must be located in this state, or the person must have in force a contract with a qualified entity to represent the person on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis in this state, including maintaining a set of records for each trust for which the person acts as a fiduciary and receiving legal process on behalf of the person; in this paragraph, “qualified entity” has the meaning given to “qualified person” in AS

13.36.390

(3)(B) and (C).

At the expense of the applicant, the department may examine or investigate the applicant in connection with an application for an exemption under this section. Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions, the department shall approve or deny the application for exemption not later than the 61st day after the date that the department considers the application complete and accepted for filing. If the application presents novel or unusual questions, the department may extend the time for approving or denying the application. The department may require the applicant to submit additional information the department considers necessary to make an informed decision.

The department may make an exemption under this section subject to conditions or limitations imposed by the department that are consistent with this chapter.

The department may adopt regulations that are consistent with this chapter defining the activities that do not constitute providing or offering fiduciary services to the general public, specifying the provisions of this chapter that are subject to an exemption under this section, and establishing procedures and requirements for obtaining, maintaining, or revoking an exemption granted under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (c)(2) of this section, “AS

13.36.390

(3)(B) and (C)” was substituted for “AS

13.36.390

(2)(B) and (C)” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of paragraphs in AS 13.36.390.

Sec. 06.26.210.
Requirements to apply for and maintain status as a private trust company.

To obtain an exemption under AS

06.26.200

, a person shall file an application with the department containing

a nonrefundable application fee established by the department by regulation;

information that demonstrates that the person qualifies under AS

06.26.200

(c);

a detailed statement under oath showing the applicant’s assets and liabilities as of the end of the month that precedes the date of the filing of the application with the department;

a statement under oath of the reason for requesting the exemption;

a statement under oath that the applicant currently does not offer fiduciary services to the general public and that the applicant will not offer fiduciary services to the general public without the prior written permission of the department;

the current street address of the physical location in this state where the applicant will maintain its records, the applicant’s current telephone number at that location, and a statement under oath that the address given is true and correct and not a United States Postal Service post office box or a private commercial mail drop;

a list of the specific provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter from which the applicant requests an exemption.

The department may not approve an exemption under this section unless the application complies with (a) of this section.

To maintain its exemption under AS

06.26.200

, a private trust company

may not offer fiduciary services to the general public;

shall continue to qualify under AS

06.26.200

(c); and

shall file an annual certification on or before December 31 of each year on a form provided by the department that the private trust company is maintaining the conditions and limitations of its exempt status; the annual certification must be accompanied by a fee established by the department by regulation.

The annual certification required under (c) of this section is valid only if it bears an acknowledgment stamped by the department. The department has 60 days from the date it receives the annual certification to review the annual certification and return a copy of the acknowledged annual certification to the private trust company. The burden is on the exempt private trust company to notify the department of a failure to return a copy of an acknowledged annual certification within the 60-day period.

The department may examine or investigate the private trust company periodically as necessary to verify the annual certification.

Notwithstanding having an exemption under AS

06.26.200

, a private trust company shall comply with the home office provisions of AS

06.26.150

and shall report to the department any change of address or telephone number within 30 days after the change.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.220.
Transfer of control.

Control of an exempt private trust company may not be sold or otherwise transferred with an exemption under AS

06.26.200

. In any change of control, the exempt status of the private trust company automatically terminates on the effective date of the transfer, and the person acquiring control must comply with this chapter. After transfer of control, a separate application for an exemption under AS

06.26.200

must be filed with the department if the acquiring person wishes to obtain or continue an exemption under AS 06.26.200.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.230.
Revocation of exemption.

The department may revoke an exemption under AS

06.26.200

if the exempt private trust company

makes a false statement under oath on any document required to be filed by this chapter;

fails to submit to an examination as required by AS

06.26.200

;

withholds requested information from the department; or

violates a provision of this chapter applicable to exempt private trust companies.

If the department determines from examination or other credible evidence that an exempt private trust company has violated a requirement of this chapter, the department may by personal delivery or registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, notify the exempt private trust company in writing that the department will revoke the private trust company’s exemption as of a stated date, which may not be before the fifth calendar day after the date that the notification is delivered or mailed. The notification must state the grounds for the revocation with reasonable certainty. After a revocation takes effect, the revocation is final, and the private trust company is subject to all of the requirements and provisions of this chapter that are applicable to private trust companies not exempt under AS

06.26.200

.

A private trust company shall comply with the provisions of this chapter from which it was formerly exempt within five calendar days after the effective date of a revocation of its exemption under this section. However, if the department determines at the time of revocation that the private trust company has been engaging in or attempting to engage in acts intended or designed to deceive or defraud, the department may, in the department’s sole discretion, shorten or eliminate the five-calendar-day compliance period.

If, within the time allowed under (c) of this section, the private trust company does not comply with all of the provisions of this chapter, including the capitalization requirements that have been determined by the department as necessary to assure the safety and soundness of the private trust company, the department may

file a court action or pursue another remedy provided by this chapter; or

refer the private trust company to the attorney general for institution of appropriate legal proceedings against the private trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.240.
Conversion to trust company.

A private trust company may not offer fiduciary services to the general public as a trust company until the private trust company satisfies the requirements of this section.

The private trust company shall file a notice with the department on a form prescribed by the department, furnish a copy of a resolution adopted by the board authorizing the private trust company to offer fiduciary services to the general public, pay any filing fee established by the department by regulation, and comply with the requirements of this chapter for trust companies. The notice must provide the name of the private trust company and acknowledge that any exemption granted or otherwise applicable to the private trust company under AS

06.26.200

ceases to apply on the effective date of the notice.

The department has 60 days after the department receives the notice under (a) of this section to review the conversion, and a private trust company may begin providing or offering fiduciary services to the general public on the 61st day after the date that the department receives a notice under (a) of this section from the private trust company, unless the department specifies a different date.

The department may extend the 60-day period of review provided by (c) of this section if the department determines that the notice raises issues that require additional information or if the department needs additional time for analysis. If the 60-day period of review is extended, the private trust company may offer fiduciary services to the general public only after written approval by the department.

The department may deny a private trust company permission to offer fiduciary services to the general public as a trust company if the department finds that the private trust company does not meet the requirements of this chapter for trust companies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.26.245.
Trust company authority.

The provisions of AS

06.26.200

—

06.26.240

may not be interpreted to prevent a trust company from providing fiduciary services as a private trust company.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 2002)